Alaska statutes. Title 5. Amusements and Sports.
Article 3. Miscellaneous Provisions.

Sec. 05.15.600.
Cancellation of permits based on unlawful provision.

If any provision of this chapter, or regulation adopted under this chapter, is determined to be unlawful, then all permits issued in connection with the licensed activity to which the unlawful provision or regulation related are cancelled.

History.

(§ 8 ch 27 SLA 1960)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

05.15.190

. Renumbered in 1994.

Collateral references. —

38 Am. Jur. 2d, Gambling, §§ 12, 13.

54 C.J.S., Lotteries, §§ 10, 11.

Sec. 05.15.610.
Order prohibiting action in violation of chapter.

If the commissioner determines that a person has engaged in an act or practice in violation of this chapter or a regulation adopted under this chapter, the commissioner may, after giving reasonable notice to the person and an opportunity for the person to be heard, issue an order prohibiting the violation by the person. The order remains in effect until the person has submitted evidence acceptable to the commissioner showing that the violation has been corrected.

If the public interest requires, the commissioner may issue an emergency order prohibiting an act or practice in violation of this chapter or a regulation adopted under this chapter without notice to or an opportunity to be heard by the person affected by the order. The commissioner shall immediately serve the person with a copy of the emergency order. An emergency order expires 60 days after the date it is issued if the person affected by the order requests a hearing within 15 days of receipt of the order. If the person does not request a hearing within 15 days of receipt of the emergency order, the order becomes permanent. Following a hearing, the commissioner may rescind, modify, or make permanent the emergency order.

A party aggrieved by an order under this section may appeal to the superior court.

History.

(§ 34 ch 70 SLA 1993)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 05.15.195. Renumbered in 1994.

Administrative Code. —

For hearings, see 15 AAC 160, art. 10.

Sec. 05.15.620.
Local prohibition of charitable gaming.

The following question, appearing alone, may be placed before the voters of a municipality or an established village in accordance with AS

05.15.625

: “Shall charitable gaming in ....... (name of municipality or village) be prohibited? (yes or no)”.

The following question, appearing alone, may be placed before the voters of a municipality or an established village in accordance with AS

05.15.625

: “Shall pull-tab sales in ....... (name of municipality or village) be prohibited? (yes or no).”

If a majority of the voters vote “yes” on the question set out in (a) or (b) of this section, the department shall be notified immediately after certification of the results of the election and thereafter the department may not issue a license, permit, or vendor registration authorizing charitable gaming or pull-tab sales, as appropriate, within the boundaries of a municipality and in unincorporated areas within five miles of the boundaries of the municipality or within the perimeter of an established village. As necessary to implement the results of an election under (a) or (b) of this section, existing licenses, permits, and vendor registrations for charitable gaming or pull-tab sales within the boundaries of a municipality and in unincorporated areas within five miles of the boundaries of the municipality or within the perimeter of an established village are void 90 days after the results of the election are certified. A license or vendor registration that will expire during the 90 days after the results of a local option election under this section are certified is void as of the expiration date.

History.

(§ 34 ch 70 SLA 1993)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 05.15.197. Renumbered in 1994, at which time “AS

05.15.625

” was substituted for “AS 05.15.198” in both subsection (a) and (b) to reflect the renumbering of AS 05.15.198.

Sec. 05.15.625.
Procedure for local option elections.

The local governing body of a municipality, whenever a number of registered voters equal to at least 10 percent of the number of votes cast at the last regular municipal election petition the local governing body to do so, shall place upon a separate ballot at the next regular election or at a special election the question set out in AS

05.15.620

that is the subject of the petition. The local governing body shall conduct the election in accordance with the election ordinance of the municipality.

The lieutenant governor, whenever 10 percent of the registered voters residing within an established village petition the lieutenant governor to do so, shall place upon a separate ballot at a special election the question set out in AS

05.15.620

that is the subject of the petition. The lieutenant governor shall conduct the election in the manner prescribed by AS 15 (Alaska Election Code).

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, an election under (a) or (b) of this section to remove a restriction on charitable gaming imposed under AS

05.15.620

may not be conducted more than once every 12 months.

AS

29.26.110

—

29.26.160

apply to a petition under (a) of this section in a general law municipality except the

number of required signatures is determined under (a) of this section rather than under AS

29.26.130

;

application filed under AS

29.26.110

must contain the question set out under AS

05.15.620

rather than containing an ordinance or resolution;

petition must contain the question set out under AS

05.15.620

rather than material required under AS

29.26.120(a)(1)

and (2).

History.

(§ 34 ch 70 SLA 1993)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 05.15.198. Renumbered in 1994, at which time “AS

05.15.620

” was substituted for “AS 05.15.197” in subsections (a), (b), (c), and (d) to reflect the renumbering of AS 05.15.197.

Sec. 05.15.640.
Restrictions on use of broadcasting.

A person may not use broadcasting to promote or conduct a charitable gaming activity under this chapter except that a person may use

broadcasting to promote a fish derby, a dog mushers’ contest, a type of classic defined in AS

05.15.690

, or a raffle and lottery; or

the Internet or an Internet communication to promote a charitable gaming activity under this chapter.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, the department may authorize a noncommercial broadcasting station or network of stations to broadcast the conducting of an activity under this chapter on the station or network under a permit held by the station or network. The department may not authorize a station to broadcast the conducting of an activity for more than 12 hours in a calendar year. In this subsection, “noncommercial broadcasting station” means a radio or television station that is licensed by the Federal Communications Commission to a governmental entity or to an entity that is exempt from federal taxation under 26 U.S.C. 501(c)(3) (Internal Revenue Code).

In this section,

“broadcasting” includes television and radio transmission by 2,500 megahertz, microwave video and audio programming, slow-scan television programming, and programming by way of satellite, cable, teletype, or facsimile transmission and distribution methods;

“Internet” means the combination of computer systems or networks that make up the international network for interactive communications services, including remote logins, file transfer, electronic mail, and newsgroups;

“Internet communication” means an announcement or advertisement disseminated through the Internet.

History.

(§§ 1, 2 ch 33 SLA 1990; am § 1 ch 55 SLA 1998; am § 5 ch 20 SLA 2008; am §§ 4, 5 ch 62 SLA 2012)

Revisor’s notes. —

The original versions of subsections (a) and (b) were enacted as §§ 1 and 2, respectively, of ch. 33, SLA 1990, and codified in 1994, at which time minor word changes were made to conform to statutory style.

Cross references. —

For a temporary exception to the limitations on using broadcasting to conduct certain online charitable gaming ticket sales, see sec. 9, ch. 2, SLA 2021, in the 2021 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2012 amendment, effective September 10, 2012, in (a)(2), deleted “radio or television broadcasting to promote a charitable” preceding “raffle and lottery”, and substituted “the Internet or an Internet communication to promote a charitable gaming activity under this chapter” for “In this subsection, ‘broadcasting’ includes television and radio transmission by 2,500 megahertz, microwave video and audio programming, slow-scan television programming, and programming by way of satellite, cable, teletype, or facsimile transmission and distribution methods; ‘raffle and lottery’ has the meaning given in AS

05.15.690

”; added (c).

Opinions of attorney general. —

Within first amendment restrictions, the state may prohibit the broadcasting of gaming activities or advertisements, but there are serious concerns, from an equal protection standpoint, with any proposal that would allow one particular group or organization to conduct or advertise game activities on the air while excluding all others. May 4, 1990 Op. Att’y Gen.

On its face, ch. 33, SLA 1990 does not appear to be constitutionally invalid because it only creates a possibility that the Department of Commerce and Economic Development (now Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development) will allow noncommercial broadcasting stations to conduct gaming to the exclusion of other organizations. If the department does allow this, then the department must be able to justify the distinction between the two types of organizations, and the analyses set out in the opinion should be used. May 4, 1990 Op. Att’y Gen.